Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 25.2 Instruction for Deaf or Hard of Hearing Students
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-25.2-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“American sign language” means the visual/gestural language used by deaf people in the United States and Canada, with semantic, syntactic, morphological, and phonological rules which are distinct from English.

“Deaf student” means an individual who has a hearing impairment which adversely affects educational performance and which is so severe that the student is impaired in processing linguistic information through hearing, with or without amplification.

“English sign” systems means sign systems developed for educational purposes, which use manual signs in English word order; sometimes with added affixes which are not present in American sign language.

“Hard of hearing student” means an individual who has a hearing impairment, whether permanent or fluctuating, which adversely affects a child’s educational performance but which is not included under the definition of “deaf student” in this section.

“Individualized education program” means a written statement developed for a student eligible for special education services pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.

“Primary communication mode, style, and language” means that communication mode, style, and language which is preferred by and most effective for a particular student, as determined by appropriate language assessment undertaken by individuals proficient in the communication mode, style, or languages being assessed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 161, § 1.

16-25.2-2.
Development of program.

In developing the individualized educational program for those students who are deaf or hard of hearing, the assessments necessary for the development of the program shall include a language assessment performed for each student to determine that student’s primary communication mode, style, and language. The language assessment shall be undertaken by individuals proficient in the communication mode, style, or language(s) being assessed. The communicative social, emotional, and cultural needs and preferences of students who are deaf or hard of hearing vary widely and deserve careful consideration. The language assessment required for development of an individualized educational program shall consider the primary means of communication to which a child is accustomed, the student’s ability and opportunities to communicate with others, whether hearing or not, and student and parent preferences for communication mode, style, and language. Some students who are deaf or hard of hearing use American sign language, others more effectively express and receive English or another language orally and aurally, with or without visual signs or cues. Other students may most effectively use a combination of language(s) or communication modes. In order to meet the individual needs of these students, a variety of options must be available when determining an appropriate program.

In undertaking the development of an individualized educational program for students who are deaf or hard of hearing, the individualized educational program team shall consider the individual educational needs of each student including, but not limited to, each of the following factors which is appropriate for the individual student:

Providing the student who is deaf or hard of hearing with administrators, teachers, teacher aids, audiologists, speech therapists, psychologists, interpreters, and other personnel who are trained to work with children who are deaf or hard of hearing and are proficient in the primary language(s) and language mode(s) of those children;

Providing children who are deaf or hard of hearing with an educational environment which includes other students who are deaf or hard of hearing who are of approximately the same age and ability and with whom they can directly communicate;

Providing children who are deaf or hard of hearing with opportunities to interact with adult role models who are deaf or hard of hearing;

Providing children who are deaf or hard of hearing with full access to all components of the educational process, including but not limited to recess, lunch, and extracurricular activities;

Teaching children who are deaf or hard of hearing in English and American sign language so that they develop an “adult” level of fluency; and

That the determination of the least restrictive environment as used in state and federal law takes into consideration the unique communication needs of children who are deaf or hard of hearing as described in this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a particular language, communication, or program choice for a student who is deaf or hard of hearing. Those determinations must be made through the individualized education decision making process for each student.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 30; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 30.

16-25.2-3.
Assessment.

Individuals involved in administering assessment tools to students who are deaf or hard of hearing shall be proficient in the student’s primary communication mode, style, or language as determined by a language assessment consistent with the requirements of §

16-25.2-2

. All assessments shall be delivered in the student’s primary communication mode, style, or language as determined by a language assessment consistent with the requirements of §

16-25.2-2

, shall have been validated for the specific purposes for which they are used, and shall be appropriately normed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 161, § 1.

16-25.2-4.
Teacher certification.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall require teachers seeking certification to teach students who are deaf or hard of hearing after July 3, 1995 to demonstrate competency in American sign language in addition to the English language and communication competencies already required for certification. The board shall adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of the general statutes, to establish standards for assessing competency which are consistent with the standards adopted by the board of examiners of interpreters for the deaf; provided, however, that the board may, through regulation, require a demonstrated level of competency less stringent than that required for interpreters. Teachers seeking certification shall be permitted to meet the requirements imposed by this section during the three (3) years of their provisional certification.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 30; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 30.